Massachusetts, session 194th, S3144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of
Bourne may transfer, release, and convey a fifty foot wide permanent right-of-way and easement
to Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC, for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and
operating a pipeline or pipelines, together with any and all necessary or useful appurtenances
thereto, for the transmission of natural gas and all by-products thereof, permanent access roads
necessary to access such facilities, and temporary workspaces necessary for the construction of
such facilities, on the following properties: 0 Bournedale Road, owned by the Town of Bourne,
as described in a deed recorded with the Barnstable County Registry of Deeds in Book 14090
and Page 282, such easement, permanent access roads, and temporary workspace, as more
particularly shown on a plan entitled “Area of Permanent Easement, Permanent Access Road &
Temporary Workspace Town of Bourne Under Care and Custody of the Conservation
Commission”, G-31-MA-BA-001-DWG, Rev E., prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc.,
and dated January 13, 2026; 0 Bournedale Road, as described in a deed recorded with the
of 2

Barnstable County Registry of Deeds particularly shown on the plan entitled, “Area of
Permanent Access Road & Temporary Workspace Town of Bourne Conservation Commission”,
G-31-MA-BA-006.DWG, Rev. B, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., and dated January
13, 2026; and 0 Deseret Drive, as described in a deed recorded with the Barnstable County
Registry of Deeds in Book 8713 and Page 321, such temporary workspace as more particularly
shown on the plan entitled “Area of Temporary Workspace Town of Bourne Conservation
Commission”, G-8-MA-BA-2025, said plans on file with the town clerk and to acquire such
replacement land as may be required under section 5A of chapter 3 of the general laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2